dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="/prperss">

        <e><p><l>vEM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hum</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vaha</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wum</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>mEM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vEM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wum</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>hm</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>vaha</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wum</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>wumhe</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>mEM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
       
<e><p><l>usa</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usa</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usane</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usane</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>use</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>use</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usako</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usako</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usase</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usase</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>usake_liye</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake_liye</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake_xvArA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake_xvArA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>usameM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usameM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usapara</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usapara</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>una</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>una</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unhoMne</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unhoMne</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unheM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unheM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unako</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unako</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unase</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unase</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>unake_liye</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake_liye</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake_xvArA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake_xvArA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>unameM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unameM</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unapara</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unapara</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>vaha</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>vaha</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ve</l><r>ve<s n="prn"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unakA</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="d"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fpl"/><s n="o"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unakI</l><r>prperss<s n="prn"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fsg"/><s n="d"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="prperss"><i></i><par n="/prperss"/></e>
<e lm="vaha"><i></i><par n="/prperss"/></e>
